Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 800.
Maintenance of financial responsibility.

Subsection (a) as currently effective; see also subsection (a) and contingent effective date of amendment note set out below.

No owner of a motor vehicle required to be registered, or operator required to be licensed or issued a learner’s permit, shall operate or permit the operation of the vehicle upon the highways of the State without having in effect an automobile liability policy or bond in the amounts of at least $25,000.00 for one person and $50,000.00 for two or more persons killed or injured and $10,000.00 for damages to property in any one crash. In lieu thereof, evidence of self-insurance in the amount of $115,000.00 must be filed with the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles and shall be maintained and evidenced in a form prescribed by the Commissioner. The Commissioner may require that evidence of financial responsibility be produced before motor vehicle inspections are performed pursuant to the requirements of section 1222 of this title.

(a)

Subsection (a) as amended by

2015, No. 50

, § 6; see also subsection (a) set out above, and contingent effective date of amendment note set out below.

No owner of a motor vehicle required to be registered, or operator required to be licensed or issued a learner’s permit, shall operate or permit the operation of the vehicle upon the highways of the State without having in effect an automobile liability policy or bond in the amounts of at least $25,000.00 for one person and $50,000.00 for two or more persons killed or injured and $10,000.00 for damages to property in any one crash. In lieu thereof, evidence of self-insurance in the amount of $115,000.00 must be filed with the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles and shall be maintained and evidenced in a form prescribed by the Commissioner. The Commissioner may adopt rules governing the standards for insurance identification cards. The Commissioner may also require that evidence of financial responsibility be produced before motor vehicle inspections are performed pursuant to the requirements of section 1222 of this title.

A person who violates subsection (a) of this section shall be assessed a civil penalty of not more than $500.00, and such violation shall be a traffic violation within the meaning of chapter 24 of this title.

Every operator of a vehicle required to be registered shall have proof of financial responsibility as required by subsection (a) of this section when operating such vehicle on the highways of this State. A person may prove financial responsibility using a portable electronic device; however, use of a device for this purpose does not in itself constitute consent for an enforcement officer to access other contents of the device. An operator cited for violating this subsection shall not be convicted if he or she sends or produces to the issuing enforcement agency within seven business days of the traffic stop proof of financial responsibility that was in effect at the time of the traffic stop.

A person who violates subsection (c) of this section shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than $100.00.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 77

, § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986; amended

1987, No. 163

(Adj. Sess.), eff. April 29, 1988;

1989, No. 84

, § 5;

1997, No. 117

, § 33, eff. Jan. 1, 1999;

2011, No. 46

, § 6;

2013, No. 67

, § 14;

2013, No. 189

(Adj. Sess.), § 13;

2015, No. 50

, § 6;

2019, No. 14

, § 62, eff. April 30, 2019.

§ 801.
Proof of financial responsibility required.

The Commissioner shall require proof of financial responsibility to satisfy any claim for damages, by reason of personal injury to or the death of any person, of at least $25,000.00 for one person and $50,000.00 for two or more persons killed or injured and $10,000.00 for damages to property in any one crash, as follows:

From a person who is convicted of any of the following violations of this title:

Death resulting from:

careless and negligent operation of a motor vehicle; or

reckless driving of a motor vehicle.

Any violation of section 1201 of this title or for any suspension pursuant to section 1205 of this title.

Failing to immediately stop and render such assistance as may be reasonably necessary following a crash resulting in injury to any person or property, other than the vehicle then under his or her control.

Operating, taking, using, or removing a motor vehicle without the consent of the owner in violation of section 1094 of this title.

Operating a motor vehicle after suspension, revocation, or refusal of a license, in violation of section 674 of this title.

[Repealed.]

[Repealed.]

The provisions of subdivisions (a)(1)(A), (C), (D), and (E) of this section shall not apply to an operator furnishing the Commissioner with satisfactory proof that a standard provisions automobile liability insurance policy, issued by an insurance company authorized to transact business in this State insuring the operator against public liability and property damage, in the amounts required under this section with respect to proof of financial responsibility, was in effect at the time of the violation. Nor shall these provisions apply if the operator was a nonresident, holding a valid license issued by the state of his or her residence, at the time of the violation, and satisfactory proof, in the form of a certificate issued by an insurance company authorized to transact business in the state of his or her residence, and accompanied by a power of attorney authorizing the Commissioner to accept service on its behalf, of notice or process in any action arising out of the violation, certifying that insurance covering the legal liability of the operator to satisfy any claim or claims for damage to person or property, in an amount equal to the amounts required under this section with respect to proof of financial responsibility was in effect at the time of the violation.

From a person against whom there is an outstanding unsatisfied judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction within this State for damages arising out of a motor vehicle crash and based upon any violation of the provisions of this title.

From the operator of a motor vehicle involved in a crash that resulted in bodily injury or death to any person or property damage, including to the motor vehicle under the operator’s control, in an aggregate amount to the extent of $3,000.00 or more, excepting, however:

an operator furnishing the Commissioner with satisfactory proof that a standard provisions automobile liability insurance policy, issued by an insurance company authorized to transact business in this State insuring the person against public liability and property damage, in the amounts required under this section with respect to proof of financial responsibility, was in effect at the time of the crash; or

a nonresident operator holding a valid license issued by the state of his or her residence at the time of the crash who furnishes satisfactory proof, in the form of a certificate issued by an insurance company authorized to transact business in the state of his or her residence, when accompanied by a power of attorney authorizing the Commissioner to accept service on its behalf of notice or process in any action upon the policy arising out of the crash, certifying that insurance covering the legal liability of the operator to satisfy any claim or claims for damage to person or property, in an amount equal to the amounts required under this section with respect to proof of financial responsibility, was in effect at the time of the crash.

The provisions of subdivision (a)(3) of this section shall not apply to the operator of a motor vehicle, involved in a crash, if at the time of the crash the motor vehicle he or she was operating, whether attended or unattended, was legally parked in any location other than upon a public highway. Nor shall the provisions of that subdivision apply to the operator of an all-terrain vehicle when the vehicle is registered and operated pursuant to chapter 31 of this title.

In lieu of the insurance policy or surety bond required under this section, a person may qualify as a self-insurer by obtaining a certificate of self-insurance from the Commissioner, who may, in his or her discretion, upon the application of such person, issue said certificate of self-insurance, when he or she is satisfied that such person is possessed of a net unencumbered capital of at least $115,000.00. The Commissioner may require annual reports from any self-insurer, which reports must show at least $115,000.00 unencumbered net worth. Whenever the Commissioner finds that any self-insurer does not possess $115,000.00 of unencumbered net worth, he or she shall revoke the certificate of self-insurance. Failure to pay any judgment, within statutory limits, after such judgment shall have become final, shall constitute reasonable grounds for the cancellation of a certificate of self-insurance. A certificate of self-insurance obtained by a self-insurer shall insure every person operating a motor vehicle, owned by said self-insurer, with his or her express or implied permission, against loss within statutory limits from the liability imposed by law upon such person arising out of the operation of said motor vehicle and shall be for the benefit of any person suffering personal injuries or property damage arising out of the use of such motor vehicle with such express or implied permission.

Where erroneous information with respect to insurance coverage is furnished to the Commissioner by the operator involved in a crash, the Commissioner shall, after receipt by him or her of correct information with respect to such coverage, take appropriate action as provided in section 802 of this title.

Within 15 days after the receipt from the Commissioner of notice of claimed insurance coverage, the insurance carrier named by the operator shall notify the Commissioner in such manner as he or she may require in case the required insurance was not in effect at the time specified in the notice. If no such notification is received by the Commissioner within 15 days, the Commissioner may assume that the required insurance was in effect at the time specified in the notice.

HISTORY:

Amended

1965, No. 4

, § 1;

1969, No. 227

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. May 1, 1970;

1971, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 1, 2, eff. March 2, 1972;

1971, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. March 1, 1973;

1977, No. 81

, § 4, eff. April 27, 1977;

1977, No. 220

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 1, 2;

1979, No. 190

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1979, No. 194

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1983, No. 61

, § 1;

1983, No. 240

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1985, No. 230

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1995, No. 17

, § 1;

1995, No. 67

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1997, No. 117

(Adj. Sess.), § 34, eff. April 29, 1998, and Jan. 1, 1999;

1999, No. 102

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1999, No. 160

(Adj. Sess.), § 14;

2011, No. 46

, § 7;

2015, No. 23

, § 122;

2015, No. 47

, § 20;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 164;

2019, No. 170

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 2021.

Party insured.

Relationship between car rental agency, as a self-insurer under Vermont’s financial responsibility law, and lessee of its vehicle was in substance one of insurance, and therefore agency’s obligation to pay under the law was “other collectible insurance” for purposes of lessee’s private automobile liability policy. Champlain Casualty Co. v. Agency Rent-A-Car, Inc., 168 Vt. 91, 716 A.2d 810, 1998 Vt. LEXIS 145 (1998).

§ 802.
Suspension of license.

Proof of financial responsibility shall cover a person in the operation of any and all motor vehicles operated by him or her. If he or she fails to furnish such proof, when required under the provisions of section 801 of this title, within 20 days after notice from the Commissioner is mailed to him or her, until such proof is furnished, the Commissioner shall suspend the license of an operator or the right of an unlicensed operator or nonresident to operate any motor vehicle in this State.

[Repealed.]

When a resident of Vermont, or a person holding a Vermont operator’s license, as a result of a motor vehicle crash in any other state has been required to furnish such other state with evidence of future financial responsibility and because of failure to do so has had his or her operating privilege suspended or revoked therefor, upon being notified by the proper official of such other jurisdiction of such suspension or revocation, the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles shall suspend the Vermont operator’s license or right of such person to operate motor vehicles, and such suspension shall remain in effect until the person suspended shall furnish the Commissioner with satisfactory evidence that he or she has complied with the requirement to furnish such other state with evidence of future financial responsibility.

-(h) [Repealed.]

(i)

No proof of financial responsibility shall be required, under subdivision 801(a)(3) of this title, and no license shall be suspended under that subdivision, unless the operator whose license or right to operate motor vehicles is subject to suspension has been afforded the opportunity of a hearing to determine whether the operator was, at the time of the crash, injury, or damage in question, insured against public liability and property damage in the amounts required under section 801 of this title with respect to proof of financial responsibility. If the operator requests a hearing, and appears at the time and place provided, the Commissioner or his or her appointed representative shall conduct a hearing, make findings, and render a decision. The hearing examiner may consider such evidence as is offered and may consider also the operator and investigating officer report or reports filed in connection with the crash, injury, or damages as well as the assumption permitted under subsection 801(e) of this title. If the decision of the hearing examiner finds the operator to be uninsured at the time of the crash, injury, or damages, then the person shall be required to provide proof of financial responsibility under this subchapter and, if he or she fails to do so, his or her license or right to operate a motor vehicle shall be suspended. A person found to be uninsured may have the finding reviewed in the Superior Court. The hearings provided for shall be conducted in Montpelier. Hearings shall be conducted with a minimum of procedural requirements, so as to provide persons an opportunity to be heard without delay and at reasonable expense to them and to the State.

HISTORY:

Amended

1965, No. 4

, § 2;

1971, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 3, 4, eff. March 2, 1972;

1977, No. 175

(Adj. Sess.);

1977, No. 220

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 3, 4;

1979, No. 194

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. May 6, 1980;

1983, No. 61

, § 2;

1995, No. 67

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1997, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 18, eff. Jan. 1, 1998.

§ 803.
Proof of financial responsibility to be kept in force.

After a person has been required to file proof of financial responsibility, he or she shall not thereafter be entitled to a renewal of his or her license, unless such proof or a renewal thereof is kept on file and in force, except as provided in section 809 of this title.
Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, any person required to furnish proof of financial responsibility shall have his or her license or privilege to operate a motor vehicle suspended and shall surrender the license on the date that the insurance expires or is terminated.

HISTORY:

Amended

1981, No. 180

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 22, 1982.

§ 804.
Method of proof.

Proof of financial responsibility shall be furnished by an insurance company authorized to do business in this State, in a form satisfactory to the Commissioner and shall be evidence of the insuring of such person against claims and judgments for personal injury and property damage in the amounts specified in section 801 of this title, provided the policy of insurance shall be noncancellable except after 15 days’ notice to the Commissioner; or such proof may be the bond of a surety company, authorized to transact business in this State, which bond shall be conditioned for the payment of such amounts. An insurance company or surety company issuing such policy or bond shall immediately furnish, for filing with the Commissioner, a satisfactory certificate certifying that such policy or bond has been issued. Instead of the certificate, proof may be furnished by any computer-generated means approved by the Commissioner. Once proof furnished in this manner is accepted by the Commissioner, the insurance company or surety company shall be bound in the same manner as if a certificate had been furnished for filing.

An insurance or surety company shall bear responsibility for its errors, including failure to file in a timely manner, in connection with the filing of the certificate referred to in subsection (a) of this section. All costs and expenses incurred by insureds and the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles as a consequence of the failure to file a properly executed certificate shall be paid by the insurance or surety company.

The Commissioner may require that an insurance or surety company appoint an in-state representative having authority to execute certificates on its behalf when an insurer fails to submit properly executed certificates.

If an insurer is not authorized to do business in this State, the Commissioner may accept a written certificate, provided that the certificate issued on behalf of an operator who is a nonresident of this State otherwise conforms with the provisions of this chapter and the insurer complies with the following conditions with respect to the policies certified:

the insurer executes a power of attorney authorizing the Commissioner to accept service on its behalf of notice or process in any action arising out of a motor vehicle crash in this State; and

the insurer agrees in writing that these policies shall be deemed to conform with the laws of this State.

If an insurer not authorized to transact business in this State but qualified to furnish proof defaults in any undertakings or agreements, the Commissioner shall not accept as proof any certificate of the insurer so long as the default continues.

HISTORY:

Amended

1983, No. 101

(Adj. Sess.);

1987, No. 192

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1995, No. 67

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1997, No. 117

(Adj. Sess.), § 36, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

§ 805.
Waiver of defenses against injured party.

When evidence of the insuring of a person, convicted of a violation of a motor vehicle law within the terms of this title, is offered as proof of financial responsibility, the presentation of such proof shall include certification that the policy of insurance or indemnity bond has a certificate waiving, as against injured persons, all defenses based on false representation or breach of warranties as set forth in the application for the policy of insurance or indemnity bond by the insured attached. Such contract, bond, or policy of insurance shall be for the benefit of a person injured in person or property, to the amounts indicated, to satisfy the legal liability of the insured.

HISTORY:

Amended

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 165.

§ 806.
Additional evidence.

Additional evidence of financial responsibility shall be furnished the Commissioner at any time upon his or her request therefor.

§ 807.
Bond.

The bond shall be held by the Commissioner to satisfy an execution issued against such person in a case arising out of damage caused by the operation of a motor vehicle owned by such person.

§ 808.
Repealed. 2007, No. 61, § 6.

§ 809.
Waiver of proof of financial responsibility.

The Commissioner shall relieve an operator from the obligation to furnish proof of financial responsibility after one year from the crash, conviction, or judgment giving rise to the obligation. In the event that a suspension or revocation resulted from the conviction giving rise to the obligation, an operator shall not be relieved of the obligation to furnish proof of financial responsibility until one year after his or her reinstatement eligibility date.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the Commissioner shall not relieve an operator from the obligation to furnish proof of financial responsibility until three years after a conviction of careless and negligent operation of a motor vehicle resulting in death, conviction of reckless driving of a motor vehicle resulting in death, or second and subsequent conviction of a violation of section 1201 of this title. In the event that a suspension resulted from the conviction giving rise to the obligation, an operator shall not be relieved of the obligation to furnish proof of financial responsibility until three years after his or her reinstatement eligibility date.

This section shall not be construed to relieve an operator of his or her responsibility to comply with the mandatory insurance requirement set forth in section 800 of this title.

HISTORY:

Amended 1965, no. 69, eff. May 19, 1965;

1977, No. 220

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

1979, No. 194

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. Jan 1, 1981;

1983, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), eff. April 7, 1984;

1987, No. 192

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1993, No. 17

, § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1994;

2019, No. 170

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 2021.

§ 810.
Uncompensated victims; reporting requirements.

The Commissioner of Financial Regulation, with cooperation of the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles and the Commissioner of Public Safety, shall direct any company issuing policies in this State insuring against liability arising out of the maintenance, ownership, or use of any motor vehicle to provide such information, reports, and data as the Commissioner determines will reasonably identify the number and characteristics of uninsured motorists and uncompensated victims of automobile crashes in the State in order to recommend policies designed to further reduce the numbers of uncompensated victims of motor vehicle crashes. As a condition of conducting business in the State, any company writing such policies shall comply with the directives of the Commissioner.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 77

, § 5; amended

1989, No. 225

(Adj. Sess.), § 25(b);

1995, No. 180

(Adj. Sess.), § 38(a);

2011, No. 78

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.